Utah statutes.
17-35b-303.   Community council form of county government.
(1)  The structural form of county government known as the "community council"
form unites in a single consolidated city and county government the powers,
duties, and functions which, immediately prior to its effective date, are
vested in the county, the largest city in the county, such other cities and
towns as elect to merge in it, and all special taxing districts, public
authorities, service areas, and other local public entities functioning within
the boundaries of the county, except school districts. The consolidated
government shall have power to extend on a countywide basis any governmental
service or function which is authorized by law or which the previous county,
cities, and other local public agencies included therein were empowered to
provide for their residents, but no such service shall be provided within an
incorporated municipality which continues to provide that service for its own
inhabitants, except upon a contract basis for the municipality, and no taxes,
assessments, fees, or other charges shall be extended or collected within the
municipality for the purpose of financing any service which is not provided by
the consolidated government within the municipality. "Largest city," as used
in this section, means a city or cities the population of which, as shown by
the most recent decennial or special census, exceeds 35% of the total county
population.
(2)  The incorporated cities and towns, other than the largest city, in the
county shall retain independent corporate existence and shall continue to
provide local services to their inhabitants of the type and to the extent
provided in the plan, but any such city or town, by majority vote of its
qualified voters, cast either concurrently with the election at which the plan
is approved or subsequently to it, as provided by the governing body of the
city or town, may cause the city or town to be dissolved and its powers,
duties, and functions vested in the countywide government.
(3)  The county legislative body of the countywide government shall be a
council composed of not less than five persons as specified in the plan,
elected respectively from communities, which collectively include all of the
territory within the county, having boundaries described in the plan embracing
substantially equal populations.  In addition to other powers vested in the
countywide government by law or pursuant to this act, the county council shall
have all of the legislative and policymaking powers which it is possible for
the governing body of a county or a city to possess and which are not
expressly denied by the constitution, by a general law applicable to all
cities or all counties, or by a specific restriction in the plan itself.
(4)  The voters of each community shall elect a community council composed of
the community's elected member of the county council, who shall be chairman of
the community council, and not less than two nor more than four additional
members elected either from districts of substantially equal population within
the community, or at large therein, as may be provided in the plan. A
community council shall have the power and duty, in conformity with guidelines
prescribed by the county council, to adopt policies and formulate specific
programs relating to and defining the kinds and levels of local governmental
services necessary to satisfy the needs and desires of the citizens within the
community, but a community council shall have no power to engage personnel or
to acquire facilities, property, or equipment for the administration or
performance of such services. Authorized programs for local governmental
services which have been approved by a community council shall be submitted to
the county council for implementation and shall be carried into effect by the
county council and county executive unless, by a vote of not less than 3/4 of
its entire membership, the county council determines that a particular
program, in whole or in part, should be rejected as contrary to the general
welfare of the county. A community council program for local governmental
services within a community:
(a)  shall include a method or methods for financing such services;
(b)  may provide for supplying of such services by contract or by joint or
cooperative action pursuant to Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation
Act, in which case the community council shall be considered a "public agency"
within the meaning of said act; and
(c)  may provide for supplying of such services through the creation of
service areas pursuant to Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 9, Service Area Act.
(5)  Notwithstanding Subsection (4), in any community which includes, in whole
or in part, the territory of a city or town, no community council program for
local government services above the minimum level of area-wide services
provided countywide may be submitted to the county council for implementation
unless it first is submitted to the governing body of each such city or town
for review. Within 30 days after such submission, the governing body of the
city or town:
(a)  may file with the community council a written statement of its comments,
suggestions, and recommendations relating to the program, and the community
council shall give due consideration thereto; or
(b)  may, by resolution or ordinance, provide that any designated part of the
community council program relating to a service to be provided within the city
or town shall be submitted to the voters thereof at a general or special
election to be held therein within 60 days after the date of the resolution or
ordinance. Any part of the program submitted to the voters of a city or town
under this Subsection (5) shall not be included in the program as submitted to
the county council unless it receives an approving vote at such election by
majority of all votes cast on the question.
(6)  Except as provided herein, the qualifications, mode of election, term of
office, method of removal, procedure to fill vacancies, compensation, and
other appropriate provisions relating to membership on the county council or
community councils shall be provided in the plan.
(7)  Upon the effective date of the plan and as provided in it, all properties
and assets, whether tangible or intangible, and all obligations, debts, and
liabilities, of those governmental entities which are merged into the new
countywide government shall become vested and transferred by operation of law
in and to the new countywide government. The properties, assets, obligations,
debts, and liabilities of any city or town not merged into the new countywide
government, so far as allocated, used, or incurred primarily to discharge a
function which under the plan will no longer be a responsibility of the city
or town, shall likewise be vested in and transferred to the new countywide
government. All transfers under this Subsection (7) shall be subject to
equitable adjustments, conditions, and limitations provided in the plan and
determined by procedures specified in the plan, but the contractual rights of
any bondholder or creditor shall not be impaired.
(8)  Upon the effective date of the plan and as provided in it, nonelective
officers and employees of governmental entities which are merged into the new
countywide government and such officers and employees of nonmerged cities or
towns whose qualifications and duties relate primarily to functions which
under the plan will no longer be a responsibility of those cities or towns,
shall be blanketed in and transferred to the new countywide government as
officers and employees of it. Standards and procedures relating to such
personnel transfers, and for resolving disputes or grievances relating
thereto, shall be provided in the plan.
